Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 1

Restitution Centers Act of 1976

41-6-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Restitution Centers Act of 1976.”

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2301.

Cross-References. Metro sheriffs' restitution program, title 7, ch. 3, part 4.

Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

41-6-102. Establishment authorized — Prerequisites to admission.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to establish residential restitution centers for the purpose of allowing persons convicted of felony offenses and sentenced to the department of correction to reimburse the victim for the value of property stolen or for damages caused by the offenses.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the programs, subject to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

A restitution center may be established inside or outside the bounds of the prison; provided, that the program shall be carried out using present facilities and administrative staff.

Before inmates are accepted into the program, they must enter into an agreement to abide by the rules, regulations and special conditions as set forth by the commissioner or the commissioner's designees.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-2302; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 6.

41-6-103. Work outside center.

The commissioner of correction may permit certain inmates to leave a residential restitution center during necessary and reasonable hours to engage in approved employment or practice legitimate self-employed occupations; provided, that the places of employment are located in this state and within daily commuting distance of the center.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-2303.

Cross-References. County workhouse work release programs, § 41-2-149.

41-6-104. Domicile of inmates.

Inmates assigned to restitution centers may be domiciled in correction detention facilities in any area of the state.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-2304.

41-6-105. Inmate earnings — Board charges.

When inmates are employed pursuant to this part, the department shall require that inmates turn over wages and salaries when received. The money shall be deposited in trust accounts and ledgers shall be maintained reflecting the status of individual accounts. Each inmate shall be liable for reasonable charges for board as fixed by the commissioner of correction.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 5; T.C.A., § 41-2305.

Cross-References. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

Jails and jailers, title 41, ch. 4.

41-6-106. Disbursement of earnings.

After initial payment of board, the wages and salaries of inmates shall be disbursed for the following purposes in the order set forth:

Reimbursement to the victims of the offense in amounts and in the manner set forth in the contract executed between the inmate, the victim and the commissioner of correction;

Necessary travel expenses to and from work;

Support of dependents, if any, in amounts fixed by the department of correction;

Payment of any outstanding court costs assessed against the inmate;

Payment in full or ratably of obligations acknowledged in writing by the inmate; and

The balance, if any, to the inmate upon discharge from confinement.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-2306.

Cross-References. Wages or salary of employed prisoners, § 41-2-129.

41-6-107. Approval of procedures for handling earnings.

Procedure for the handling of all funds as set forth in this chapter shall be subject to review and approval by the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration. The funds received by the state shall constitute departmental revenues.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 7; T.C.A., § 41-2307.

Cross-References. Wages or salary of employed prisoners, § 41-2-129.

41-6-108. Failure to return.

In the event inmates participating in restitution employment programs fail to return to the restitution centers within specified time limits, that failure shall constitute prima facie evidence of escape and shall be punished under the penalties imposed by the laws of this state.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 8; T.C.A., § 41-2308.

Cross-References. Escape, § 39-16-605.

Failure to return from work on time as evidence of intent to escape, § 41-2-137.

41-6-109. Screening inmates.

Participating inmates shall be carefully screened and the committing courts shall be consulted before an inmate is placed in the restitution program.

Acts 1976, ch. 818, § 9; T.C.A., § 41-2309.